Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.370

Comprehensive cancer care collaborative arrangements—Prohibition on regulation as state agency.

No county may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, regulation, or rule that regulates or otherwise treats a comprehensive cancer center participating in a collaborative arrangement as defined in RCW 28B.10.930 that is operated in conformance with RCW 28B.10.930 as a state agency. Such a comprehensive cancer center is still subject to ordinances, regulations, and rules that are generally applicable in nature.

[ 2022 c 71 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 71: See note following RCW 28B.10.930.